Nebraska, session 109, LB922.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB922 LB922
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-1411.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-1411.01 (1) To pay the expenses of the administration, operation,
maintenance, and enforcement of the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation
Act, the board shall collect with each application for each class of
license fees not exceeding the following amounts:
(a) Motor vehicle dealer's license, one thousand four hundred
dollars;
(b) Supplemental motor vehicle dealer's license, five hundred twenty
dollars;
(c) Dealer's agent license, five one hundred dollars;
(d) Motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer manufacturer's license,
one thousand five six hundred dollars;
(e) Distributor's license, one thousand five six hundred dollars;
(f) Factory representative's license, one hundred twenty dollars;
(g) Distributor representative's license, one hundred twenty
dollars;
(h) Finance company's license, one thousand four hundred dollars;
(i) Wrecker or salvage dealer's license, five two hundred dollars;
(j) Factory branch license, five two hundred dollars;
(k) Motorcycle dealer's license, one thousand four hundred dollars;
(l) Motor vehicle auction dealer's license, one thousand four
hundred dollars; and
(m) Trailer dealer's license, one thousand four hundred dollars.
(2) The fees shall be fixed by the board and shall not exceed the
amount actually necessary to sustain the administration, operation,
maintenance, and enforcement of the act.
(3) Such licenses, if issued, shall expire on December 31 next
following the date of the issuance thereof. Any motor vehicle,
motorcycle, or trailer dealer changing its location shall not be required
to obtain a new license if the new location is within the same city
-2-

LB922 LB922
2026 2026
limits or county, all requirements of law are complied with, and a fee of
one hundred twenty-five dollars is paid, but any change of ownership of
any licensee shall require a new application for a license and a new
license. Change of name of licensee without change of ownership shall
require the licensee to obtain a new license and pay a fee of fifty five
dollars. Applications shall be made each year for a new or renewal
license. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include
the applicant's social security number.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-1411.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-